fts/tsearch_data/russian.dict
Вавилов/G
Вернадский/G
Грибоедов/G
Достоевский/G
Жуковский/G
Змееносец/G
Илья/G
Колмогоров/G
Курчатов/G
Ленин/G
Лобачевский/G
Ломоносов/G
Ляпунов/G
Менделеев/G
Остроградский/G
Пушкин/G
Репин/G
Сталин/G
Торжок/G
Чебышев/G
Чебышёв/G
Чехов/G
алтарь/G
бадья/G
балычок/G
бардачок/G
бесенок/G
бесёнок/G
блиночек/G
богатырь/G
брачок/G
букварь/G
бунтарь/G
варенец/G
веерочек/G
ветерочек/G
взгорочек/G
вождь/G
волдырь/G
волосочек/G
враль/G
вратарь/G
вьюночек/G
гвоздь/G
главарь/G
глазочек/G
глухарь/G
головня/G
госсекретарь/G
гребешочек/G
декабрь/G
дикарь/G
дневничок/G
дождь/G
долгунец/G
достаток/G
дымарь/G
епитимья/G
жарок/G
жеребеночек/G
жеребёночек/G
жнея/G
журавль/G
затылочек/G
звонарь/G
земля/G
змея/G
золотарь/G
календарь/G
карась/G
квасок/G
кетмень/G
кипяток/G
кипяточек/G
кисель/G
кистень/G
кленочек/G
клешня/G
ключарь/G
кобель/G
кобзарь/G
козленочек/G
козлёночек/G
колея/G
колосочек/G
конь/G
коньячок/G
корабль/G
король/G
коростель/G
корчмарь/G
косарь/G
костыль/G
котеночек/G
котёночек/G
кремль/G
кубарь/G
кукушонок/G
куль/G
курень/G
куркуль/G
кустарь/G
кушачок/G
ладья/G
ларь/G
лачок/G
ледок/G
ледочек/G
ленок/G
линь/G
ложкарь/G
лунь/G
лучок/G
лыжня/G
малышок/G
марганец/G
матерок/G
медвежоночек/G
медок/G
миленок/G
миленочек/G
милёнок/G
милёночек/G
миропорядок/G
молоднячок/G
монастырь/G
москаль/G
мотыль/G
нетопырь/G
ноздря/G
ноль/G
ноябрь/G
нуль/G
образочек/G
обрывочек/G
огарочек/G
октябрь/G
осинничек/G
патруль/G
переизбыток/G
пескарь/G
песочек/G
петля/G
пискля/G
поводырь/G
подмалевок/G
подмалёвок/G
подросточек/G
подшерсток/G
подшёрсток/G
поземок/G
позёмок/G
полугодок/G
полудикарь/G
полынья/G
пономарь/G
попадья/G
посошок/G
почтарь/G
простыня/G
псарь/G
пузырь/G
пупочек/G
пупырь/G
пустырь/G
пушкарь/G
размазня/G
разочек/G
рассольничек/G
ребеночек/G
ребёночек/G
репейничек/G
рожочек/G
рубль/G
руль/G
сахарок/G
свежачок/G
свинец/G
свинья/G
свисточек/G
секретарь/G
семья/G
сентябрь/G
сизарь/G
ситничек/G
скамья/G
скосарь/G
скуфья/G
словарь/G
снегирь/G
снежочек/G
сопля/G
статья/G
стрепетенок/G
стрепетёнок/G
струя/G
ступня/G
судья/G
сухарь/G
табачок/G
творожок/G
тенечек/G
тенёчек/G
тетраэтилсвинец/G
тля/G
тропарь/G
троячок/G
тулья/G
упадок/G
упырь/G
февраль/G
ферзь/G
ферромарганец/G
фитиль/G
фонарь/G
хлебушек/G
хмырь/G
хорь/G
хренок/G
царь/G
часочек/G
червь/G
чертенок/G
чертёнок/G
чесночок/G
швея/G
шестерня/G
шмель/G
штырь/G
юморок/G
ягненочек/G
ягнёночек/G
язь/G
январь/G
ячея/G
ячмень/G
